District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.32

Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to claims arising between April 20, 1999 and December 31, 2005, and to contracts executed and in effect between April 20, 1999 and December 31, 2005.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-244, § 3, 46 DCR 1080
2001 Ed., § 2-323.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.52.